Tables/Contraction/zh-tw-polyphone.cti
always 一了 16-3-14-246-4
always 一匹 16-3-1234-16-4
always 一撮 16-3-245-25-5
always 一擁 16-3-235-3
always 一暴 16-3-1234-34-5
always 一朝 16-3-1-146-3
always 一著 16-3-1-25-2
always 一行 16-3-1235-1346-2
always 一覺 16-3-13-246-5
always 三更 15-1236-3-13-13456-3
always 三省 15-1236-3-15-13456-4
always 三行 15-1236-3-1235-1346-2
always 三重 15-1236-3-12-12346-2
always 上供 24-1346-5-13-12346-5
always 上將 24-1346-5-13-46-5
always 上當 24-1346-5-145-1346-5
always 上相 24-1346-5-15-46-5
always 上聲 24-1346-4-24-1356-3
always 下子 15-23456-5-125-156-1
always 不中 135-34-5-1-12346-5
always 不了 135-34-5-14-246-4
always 不勝 135-34-5-24-1356-3
always 不當 135-34-5-145-1346-5
always 不省 135-34-5-15-13456-4
always 不禁 135-34-5-13-1456-3
always 不舍 135-34-5-24-2346-4
always 不著 135-34-5-1-146-2
always 不阿 135-34-5-2346-3
always 不鮮 135-34-5-15-2345-4
always 丞相 12-1356-2-15-46-5
always 中傷 1-12346-5-24-1346-3
always 中意 1-12346-5-16-5
always 中暑 1-12346-5-24-34-4
always 中毒 1-12346-5-145-34-2
always 中獎 1-12346-5-13-46-4
always 中肯 1-12346-5-123-136-4
always 中舉 1-12346-5-13-1256-4
always 中計 1-12346-5-13-16-5
always 中風 1-12346-5-12345-1356-3
always 丸子 12456-2-125-156-1
always 主將 1-34-4-13-46-5
always 乘興 12-1356-2-15-13456-5
always 乾嘉 245-2345-2-13-23456-3
always 乾坤 245-2345-2-123-123456-3
always 乾隆 245-2345-2-14-12346-2
always 亂子 14-12456-5-125-156-1
always 了了 14-246-4-14-246-4
always 了事 14-246-4-24-156-5
always 了得 14-246-4-145-2346-2
always 了悟 14-246-4-34-5
always 了斷 14-246-4-145-12456-5
always 了然 14-246-4-1245-1236-2
always 了結 14-246-4-13-346-2
always 了解 14-246-4-13-346-4
always 五更 34-4-13-13456-3
always 交卷 13-246-3-13-45-5
always 交惡 13-246-3-34-5
always 交臂 13-246-3-135-16-5
always 交還 13-246-3-1235-12456-2
always 京都 13-13456-3-145-34-3
always 亭子 124-13456-2-125-156-1
always 亮相 14-46-5-15-46-5
always 亶父 145-1236-4-12345-34-4
always 人參 1245-136-2-24-136-3
always 什么 24-2346-2-134-2346-1
always 什麼 24-2346-2-134-2346-1
always 休假 15-234-3-13-23456-5
always 伙子 1235-25-4-125-156-1
always 伺候 245-156-5-1235-12356-5
always 位子 1246-5-125-156-1
always 佝僂 123-12356-5-14-12356-2
always 來降 14-2456-2-15-46-2
always 例假 14-16-5-13-23456-5
always 例子 14-16-5-125-156-1
always 供品 13-12346-5-1234-1456-4
always 供應 13-12346-3-13456-5
always 供桌 13-12346-5-1-25-3
always 供給 13-12346-3-13-16-4
always 供詞 13-12346-5-245-156-2
always 供養 13-12346-5-46-5
always 依傍 16-3-135-1346-5
always 便宜 1234-2345-2-16-2
always 信差 15-1456-5-12-2456-3
always 俯畜 12345-34-4-15-1256-5
always 俸給 12345-1356-5-13-16-4
always 倉卒 245-1346-3-245-34-5
always 倉頡 245-1346-3-13-346-2
always 個子 13-2346-5-125-156-1
always 倔強 13-236-2-13-46-5
always 假日 13-23456-5-1245-156-5
always 假期 13-23456-5-245-16-2
always 偏好 1234-2345-3-1235-146-5
always 健將 13-2345-5-13-46-5
always 傳記 1-12456-5-13-16-5
always 儐相 135-1456-3-15-46-5
always 儒將 1245-34-2-13-46-5
always 償還 12-1346-2-1235-12456-2
always 允當 256-4-145-1346-5
always 兄長 15-235-3-1-1346-4
always 充分 12-12346-3-12345-136-5
always 充塞 12-12346-3-15-2346-5
always 克難 123-2346-5-1345-1236-5
always 兒子 156-2-125-156-1
always 兔子 124-34-5-125-156-1
always 入相 1245-34-5-15-46-5
always 內應 1345-356-5-13456-5
always 內相 1345-356-5-15-46-5
always 內省 1345-356-5-15-13456-4
always 內行 1345-356-5-1235-1346-2
always 公差 13-12346-3-12-2456-3
always 公撮 13-12346-3-245-25-5
always 共處 13-12346-5-12-34-4
always 典當 145-2345-4-145-1346-5
always 兼差 13-2345-3-12-2456-3
always 冊子 245-2346-5-125-156-1
always 冠冕 13-12456-3-134-2345-4
always 冠蓋 13-12456-3-13-2456-5
always 冷藏 14-1356-4-245-1346-2
always 凱撒 123-2456-4-15-345-3
always 凳子 145-1356-5-125-156-1
always 出將 12-34-3-13-46-5
always 出差 12-34-3-12-2456-3
always 出沒 12-34-3-134-126-5
always 刀子 145-146-3-125-156-1
always 分內 12345-136-5-1345-356-5
always 分外 12345-136-5-2356-5
always 分子 12345-136-5-125-156-4
always 分行 12345-136-3-1235-1346-2
always 分量 12345-136-5-14-46-5
always 切換 245-346-3-1235-12456-5
always 切除 245-346-3-12-34-2
always 列傳 14-346-5-1-12456-5
always 刨土 1234-146-2-124-34-4
always 刨地 1234-146-2-145-16-5
always 刨子 1234-146-2-125-156-1
always 刷子 24-35-3-125-156-1
always 剎車 24-345-5-12-2346-3
always 剎那 12-345-5-1345-25-2
always 剝削 135-126-3-15-236-3
always 副將 12345-34-5-13-46-5
always 創痕 12-456-3-1235-136-2
always 助長 1-34-5-1-1346-4
always 勇將 235-4-13-46-5
always 勉強 134-2345-4-245-46-4
always 勒倒 14-356-3-145-146-4
always 勒傷 14-356-3-24-1346-3
always 勒昏 14-356-3-1235-123456-3
always 勒死 14-356-3-15-156-4
always 勒痕 14-356-3-1235-136-2
always 動脈 145-12346-5-134-2456-5
always 勝任 24-1356-3-1245-136-5
always 勝數 24-1356-3-24-34-4
always 勞軍 14-146-5-13-256-3
always 勸降 245-45-5-15-46-2
always 勺子 24-146-2-125-156-1
always 勻稱 256-2-12-136-5
always 勾當 13-12356-3-145-1346-5
always 包子 135-146-3-125-156-1
always 包藏 135-146-3-245-1346-2
always 匕見 135-16-4-15-2345-5
always 化子 1235-35-3-125-156-1
always 北伐 135-356-4-12345-345-3
always 匣子 15-23456-2-125-156-1
always 匹夫 1234-16-4-12345-34-3
always 匹婦 1234-16-4-12345-34-5
always 匹敵 1234-16-4-145-16-2
always 匹配 1234-16-4-1234-356-5
always 區長 245-1256-3-1-1346-4
always 十行 24-156-2-1235-1346-2
always 千乘 245-2345-3-24-1356-5
always 午覺 34-4-13-246-5
always 半載 135-1236-5-125-2456-4
always 卒子 125-34-2-125-156-1
always 卓著 1-25-2-1-34-5
always 協調 15-346-2-124-246-2
always 南無 1345-1236-2-134-126-2
always 占卜 1-1236-3-135-34-4
always 占星 1-1236-3-15-13456-3
always 危難 1246-2-1345-1236-5
always 卷子 13-45-5-125-156-1
always 卷宗 13-45-5-125-12346-3
always 卿相 245-13456-3-15-46-5
always 原著 45-2-1-34-5
always 厭惡 2345-5-34-5
always 去脈 245-1256-5-134-2456-5
always 參商 24-136-3-24-1346-3
always 參將 245-1236-3-13-46-5
always 參差 245-136-3-245-156-3
always 參與 245-1236-3-1256-5
always 叉子 12-345-3-125-156-1
always 反應 12345-1236-4-13456-5
always 反相 12345-1236-4-15-46-5
always 反省 12345-1236-4-15-13456-4
always 反間 12345-1236-4-13-2345-5
always 受降 24-12356-5-15-46-2
always 受難 24-12356-5-1345-1236-5
always 口供 123-12356-4-13-12346-5
always 口吃 123-12356-4-13-16-2
always 口子 123-12356-4-125-156-1
always 古玩 13-34-4-12456-5
always 句子 13-1256-5-125-156-1
always 句踐 13-12356-3-13-2345-5
always 可惡 123-2346-4-34-5
always 可數 123-2346-4-24-34-4
always 可汗 123-2346-5-1235-1236-2
always 台子 124-2456-2-125-156-1
always 司長 15-156-3-1-1346-4
always 各行 13-2346-5-1235-1346-2
always 吆喝 246-3-1235-2346-5
always 吊子 145-246-5-125-156-1
always 名分 134-13456-2-12345-136-5
always 名將 134-13456-2-13-46-5
always 名著 134-13456-2-1-34-5
always 吐蕃 124-34-4-12345-1236-3
always 吞沒 124-123456-3-134-126-5
always 否極 1234-16-4-13-16-2
always 含混 1235-1236-2-1235-123456-4
always 呆子 145-2456-3-125-156-1
always 告假 13-146-5-13-23456-5
always 呢呢 1345-16-2-1345-16-2
always 呢喃 1345-16-2-1345-1236-2
always 呢絨 1345-16-2-1245-12346-2
always 呼應 1235-34-3-13456-5
always 命脈 134-13456-5-134-2456-5
always 咆哮 1234-146-2-15-246-3
always 咋舌 125-2346-2-24-2346-2
always 咶噪 13-35-3-125-146-5
always 咽喉 2345-3-1235-12356-2
always 哀號 2456-3-1235-146-2
always 品行 1234-1456-4-15-13456-5
always 哄騙 1235-12346-4-1234-2345-5
always 哆嗦 145-25-3-15-25-3
always 哈喇 123-345-3-14-345-1
always 哨子 24-146-5-125-156-1
always 哩嚕 14-16-3-14-34-3
always 哭號 123-34-3-1235-146-2
always 哮喘 15-246-3-12-12456-4
always 哽咽 13-1356-4-346-5
always 唱和 12-1346-5-1235-2346-5
always 商行 24-1346-3-1235-1346-2
always 商賈 24-1346-3-13-34-4
always 問卷 123456-5-13-45-5
always 啞吧 23456-4-135-345-3
always 啞啞 23456-3-23456-3
always 喀什 123-345-5-24-156-2
always 喀吧 123-345-3-135-345-3
always 喁喁 1256-2-1256-2
always 喜好 15-16-4-1235-146-5
always 喝采 1235-2346-5-245-2456-4
always 單于 12-1236-2-1256-2
always 單子 145-1236-3-125-156-1
always 嗎啡 134-345-4-12345-356-3
always 嗓子 15-1346-4-125-156-1
always 嗚咽 34-3-346-5
always 嗜好 24-156-5-1235-146-5
always 嘀咕 145-16-2-13-34-3
always 嘔吐 12356-4-124-34-5
always 嘔氣 12356-5-245-16-5
always 嘩啦 1235-35-3-14-345-3
always 嘰哩 13-16-3-14-16-3
always 噁心 2346-4-15-1456-3
always 器樂 245-16-5-236-5
always 嚇阻 1235-2346-5-125-34-4
always 四行 15-156-5-1235-1346-2
always 回應 1235-1246-2-13456-5
always 因應 1456-3-13456-5
always 因為 1456-3-1246-5
always 固著 13-34-5-1-25-2
always 圈子 245-45-3-125-156-1
always 國樂 13-25-2-236-5
always 國都 13-25-2-145-34-3
always 國難 13-25-2-1345-1236-5
always 團長 124-12456-2-1-1346-4
always 土著 124-34-4-1-34-5
always 土長 124-34-4-1-1346-4
always 在行 125-2456-5-1235-1346-2
always 地鋪 145-16-5-1234-34-5
always 坎坷 123-1236-4-123-2346-4
always 坐騎 125-25-5-13-16-5
always 坦率 124-1236-4-24-2356-5
always 埋沒 134-2456-2-134-126-5
always 執著 1-156-2-1-25-2
always 報應 135-146-5-13456-5
always 場合 12-1346-2-1235-2346-2
always 場面 12-1346-2-134-2345-5
always 塞住 15-2456-3-1-34-5
always 塞子 15-2456-3-125-156-1
always 塞滿 15-2456-3-134-1236-4
always 塞牙 15-2456-3-23456-2
always 墊子 145-2345-5-125-156-1
always 墜子 1-1246-5-125-156-1
always 增長 125-1356-3-1-1346-4
always 墨翟 134-126-5-145-16-2
always 壅塞 235-4-15-2346-5
always 壩子 135-345-5-125-156-1
always 外相 2356-5-15-46-5
always 外行 2356-5-1235-1346-2
always 外長 2356-5-1-1346-4
always 多重 145-25-3-12-12346-2
always 夢魘 134-1356-5-346-5
always 大宛 145-345-5-45-3
always 大將 145-345-5-13-46-5
always 大率 145-345-5-24-2356-5
always 大難 145-345-5-1345-1236-5
always 天分 124-2345-3-12345-136-5
always 天涯 124-2345-3-26-2
always 天相 124-2345-3-15-46-5
always 太監 124-2456-5-13-2345-5
always 太行 124-2456-5-1235-1346-2
always 夫差 12345-34-3-12-2456-3
always 夭折 246-4-1-2346-2
always 失當 24-156-3-145-1346-5
always 失調 24-156-3-124-246-2
always 夾子 13-23456-2-125-156-1
always 夾縫 13-23456-2-12345-1356-5
always 奇數 13-16-3-24-34-5
always 奉還 12345-1356-5-1235-12456-2
always 奉養 12345-1356-5-46-5
always 奏樂 125-12356-5-236-5
always 奮臂 12345-136-5-135-16-5
always 女將 1345-1256-4-13-46-5
always 好動 1235-146-5-145-12346-5
always 好勝 1235-146-5-24-1356-5
always 好問 1235-146-5-123456-5
always 好奇 1235-146-5-245-16-2
always 好惡 1235-146-5-34-5
always 好戰 1235-146-5-1-1236-5
always 好者 1235-146-5-1-2346-4
always 好鬥 1235-146-5-145-12356-5
always 妊娠 1245-136-5-24-136-3
always 妥當 124-25-4-145-1346-5
always 妮子 1345-16-2-125-156-1
always 委曲 1246-4-245-1256-3
always 姨子 16-2-125-156-1
always 姪子 1-156-2-125-156-1
always 威嚇 1246-3-1235-2346-5
always 娃娃 35-2-35-3
always 娜娜 1345-25-4-1345-25-4
always 婀娜 2346-3-1345-25-4
always 婆子 1234-126-2-125-156-1
always 嫂子 15-146-4-125-156-1
always 嫋娜 1345-246-4-1345-25-2
always 嫌惡 15-2345-2-34-5
always 嫡長 145-16-2-1-1346-4
always 嬌娃 13-246-3-35-3
always 子彈 125-156-4-145-1236-5
always 字帖 125-156-5-124-346-5
always 孝養 15-246-5-46-5
always 孩子 1235-2456-2-125-156-1
always 孫子 15-123456-3-125-156-1
always 學長 15-236-2-1-1346-4
always 宅子 1-2456-2-125-156-1
always 守分 24-12356-4-12345-136-5
always 守將 24-12356-4-13-46-5
always 安分 1236-3-12345-136-5
always 宏都 1235-12346-2-145-34-3
always 官長 13-12456-3-1-1346-4
always 定省 145-13456-5-15-13456-4
always 定都 145-13456-5-145-34-3
always 宣勞 15-45-3-14-146-5
always 宣導 15-45-3-145-146-5
always 宰相 125-2456-4-15-46-5
always 害臊 1235-2456-5-15-146-5
always 家子 13-23456-3-125-156-1
always 家當 13-23456-3-145-1346-5
always 家累 13-23456-3-14-356-4
always 家長 13-23456-3-1-1346-4
always 寒假 1235-1236-2-13-23456-5
always 審度 24-136-4-145-25-5
always 將令 13-46-5-14-13456-5
always 將佐 13-46-5-125-25-4
always 將士 13-46-5-24-156-5
always 將官 13-46-5-13-12456-3
always 將帥 13-46-5-24-2356-5
always 將材 13-46-5-245-2456-2
always 將校 13-46-5-15-246-5
always 將相 13-46-5-15-46-5
always 將門 13-46-5-134-136-2
always 將領 13-46-5-14-13456-4
always 專橫 1-12456-3-1235-1356-5
always 專著 1-12456-3-1-34-5
always 尊長 125-123456-3-1-1346-4
always 對應 145-1246-5-13456-5
always 對稱 145-1246-5-12-136-5
always 導彈 145-146-4-145-1236-5
always 導播 145-146-4-135-126-3
always 小傳 15-246-4-1-12456-5
always 少壯 24-146-5-1-456-5
always 少女 24-146-5-1345-1256-4
always 少婦 24-146-5-12345-34-5
always 少安 24-146-3-1236-3
always 少將 24-146-5-13-46-5
always 少年 24-146-5-1345-2345-2
always 少康 24-146-5-123-1346-3
always 少林 24-146-5-14-1456-2
always 少爺 24-146-5-346-2
always 就得 13-234-5-145-356-4
always 尾巴 16-4-135-345-3
always 局長 13-1256-2-1-1346-4
always 屋子 34-3-125-156-1
always 屏息 135-13456-4-15-16-2
always 屏退 135-13456-4-124-1246-5
always 岑參 245-136-2-24-136-3
always 岔子 12-345-5-125-156-1
always 巡更 15-256-2-13-1356-3
always 左傳 125-25-4-1-12456-5
always 巨著 13-1256-5-1-34-5
always 差不 12-345-5-135-34-5
always 差事 12-2456-3-24-156-5
always 差使 12-2456-3-24-156-4
